Utah statutes.
41-4-1.   Agreements to finance through designated source which lessen
competition or create monopoly declared void.
It shall be unlawful for any person who is engaged, either directly or
indirectly, in the manufacture or distribution of motor vehicles, to sell or
enter into a contract to sell motor vehicles, whether patented or unpatented,
to any person who is engaged or intends to engage in the business of selling
such motor vehicles at retail in this state, on the condition or with an
agreement or understanding, either express or implied, that such person so
engaged in selling motor vehicles at retail shall in any manner finance the
purchase or sale of any one or number of motor vehicles only with or through a
designated person or class of persons or shall sell and assign the conditional
sales contracts, chattel mortgages or leases arising from the sale of motor
vehicles or any one or number thereof only to a designated person or class of
persons, when the effect of the condition, agreement or understanding so
entered into may be to lessen or eliminate competition, or create or tend to
create a monopoly in the person or class of persons who are designated, by
virtue of such condition, agreement or understanding to finance the purchase
or sale of motor vehicles or to purchase such conditional sales contracts,
chattel mortgages or leases, and any such condition, agreement or
understanding is hereby declared to be void and against the public policy of
this state.
